Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-140
Appeal; procedure.

Any person aggrieved by an order of the division or by the granting or denial of any license, certificate, or registration may appeal the order or such granting or denial, and the appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1945, c. 5, § 10(2), p. 96;

Laws 1988, LB 352, § 8;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 33.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.